District of Columbia statutes.
2-209.01

Reciprocal police mutual aid agreements — Authorized.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is hereby authorized in his discretion to enter into and renew reciprocal agreements, for such period as he deems advisable, with any county, municipality, or other governmental unit in the States of Maryland and Virginia, in order to establish and carry into effect a plan to provide mutual aid, through the furnishing of policemen and other agents and employees, together with all necessary equipment.

Oct. 17, 1968, 82 Stat. 1150, Pub. L. 90-587, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 667, Pub. L. 91-358, title VIII, § 801
1981 Ed., § 1-1125.
1973 Ed., § 1-820.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.